Arkansas, session 2025, SB600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 4, Chapter 56, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
4-56-108. Jurisdiction and venue requirements for certain contracts.
(a) Notwithstanding any contractual provision to the contrary, if an
Arkansas resident, while in this state, enters into a contract to purchase or
to finance a purchase of real or personal property in Arkansas in an amount
equal to or less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000), then:
(1) Arkansas law governs the transaction; and
(2) Any litigation pertaining to a contract described under this
section is subject to the jurisdiction of this state.
(b) This section only applies to personal property if the personal
property is used as a dwelling unit in Arkansas.
(c) As used in this section, "resident" means an individual only and
does not include a corporate entity.
*ANS470*
04-08-2025 10:54:58 ANS470

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 S4/8/25 SB600
/s/C. Tucker



































04-08-2025 10:54:58 ANS470